Maryland, session 2026, HB1001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
10–304.
(a) (1) A police officer who is on duty at a polling place shall obey the order of
an election judge for that polling place, THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR, THE DEPUTY
STATE ADMINISTRATOR, OR A LOCAL BOARD EMPLOYEE OR A LOCAL ELECTION
DIRECTOR.
(2) A police officer making an arrest under an order of an election judge,
THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR, THE DEPUTY STATE ADMINISTRATOR, OR A LOCAL
BOARD EMPLOYEE OR A LOCAL ELECTION DIRECTOR is fully protected in so doing as if
the police officer received a valid warrant to make the arrest.
(b) A police officer who is on duty at a polling place shall protect a challenger or
watcher in the discharge of the duties of the challenger or watcher.
10–307.1.

HOUSE BILL 1001 3
(A) WHILE SERVING IN IN A POLLING PLACE, THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR,
THE DEPUTY STATE ADMINISTRATOR, OR A LOCAL BOARD EMPLOYEE A LOCAL
ELECTION DIRECTOR HAS THE AUTHORITY TO:
(1) KEEP THE PEACE; AND
(2) ORDER THE ARREST OF ANY PERSON WHO:
(I) BREACHES THE PEACE;
(II) BREACHES ANY PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
(III) INTERFERES WITH THE WORK OF THE ELECTION JUDGES IN
CONDUCTING THE ELECTION AND CARRYING OUT THEIR ASSIGNED TASKS.
(B) (1) WHILE SERVING IN A POLLING PLACE, A LOCAL BOARD EMPLOYEE
ELECTION DIRECTOR MAY SHALL PROTECT A CHALLENGER OR WATCHER IN THE
EXERCISE OF THE RIGHTS OF A CHALLENGER OR WATCHER AS PROVIDED IN §
10–311 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) (I) A LOCAL BOARD EMPLOYEE ELECTION DIRECTOR IS NOT
REQUIRED TO ADMIT A CHALLENGER OR WATCHER TO A POLLING PLACE BEFORE
THE POLLS OPEN IF THE CHALLENGER OR WATCHER WAS NOT PRESENT AT THE
POLLING PLACE AT LEAST 30 MINUTES BEFORE ITS OPENING.
(II) A LOCAL BOARD EMPLOYEE ELECTION DIRECTOR MAY
REQUIRE CHALLENGERS AND WATCHERS TO LEAVE A POLLING PLACE BEFORE IT
OPENS IF THE LOCAL BOARD EMPLOYEE ELECTION DIRECTOR HAS REASON TO
BELIEVE THAT THE PRESENCE OF THE CHALLENGERS AND WATCHERS WILL
PREVENT THE TIMELY OPENING OF THE POLLING PLACE.
(C) A LOCAL BOARD EMPLOYEE ELECTION DIRECTOR MAY EXERCISE THE
AUTHORITY UNDER SUBSECTIONS (A) AND (B) OF THIS SECTION INDEPENDENT OF
AN ELECTION JUDGE ASSIGNED TO THE POLLING PLACE.
10–311.
(a) (1) The following persons [or entities] have the right to designate a
registered voter as [a] AN ACCREDITED challenger or a watcher at each POLLING place
[of registration and election] OR EARLY VOTING CENTER:
(i) the State Board for any [polling place] LOCATION in the State;

HOUSE BILL 1001
(ii) a local board for any [polling place located] LOCATION in the
county of the local board;
(iii) a candidate FOR ANY LOCATION WHERE THE CANDIDATE IS
INCLUDED ON THE BALLOT;
(iv) a political party; [and]
(v) [any other group of voters supporting or opposing a candidate,
principle, or proposition on the ballot] A POLITICAL COMMITTEE; AND
(VI) A PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE REPORTS UNDER § 13–306 OR
§ 13–307 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) A person who appoints [a] AN ACCREDITED challenger or watcher may
remove the challenger or watcher at any time.
(b) Except as provided in § 10–303(d)(2) of this subtitle and subsection (d) of this
section, [a] AN ACCREDITED challenger or watcher has the right to:
(1) enter the polling place OR EARLY VOTING CENTER one–half hour
before the polls open;
(2) enter or be present at the polling place OR EARLY VOTING CENTER at
any time when the polls are open;
(3) remain in the polling place OR EARLY VOTING CENTER until the
completion of all tasks associated with the close of the polls under § 10–314 of this subtitle
and the election judges leave the polling place OR EARLY VOTING CENTER;
(4) maintain a list of registered voters who have voted, or individuals who
have cast provisional ballots, and take the list outside of the polling place OR EARLY
VOTING CENTER; and
(5) enter and leave a polling place OR EARLY VOTING CENTER for the
purpose of taking outside of the polling place OR EARLY VOTING CENTER information that
identifies registered voters who have cast ballots or individuals who have cast provisional
ballots.
(c) (1) (i) A certificate signed by [any party or candidate] A DESIGNATING
PERSON shall be sufficient evidence of the right of [a] AN ACCREDITED challenger or
watcher to be present in the voting room.

HOUSE BILL 1001 5
(ii) The State Board shall prescribe a form that shall be supplied to
the ACCREDITED challenger or watcher by the DESIGNATING person [or entity
designating the challenger or watcher].
(III) A DESIGNATING PERSON SHALL SUBMIT A COPY OF THE
CERTIFICATE OF AN ACCREDITED CHALLENGER OR WATCHER TO THE APPROPRIATE
LOCAL BOARD BEFORE THE ACCREDITED CHALLENGER OR WATCHER MAY ENTER
THE VOTING ROOM.
(2) A challenger or watcher shall be positioned near the election judges and
inside the voting room so that the challenger or watcher may see and hear each person as
the person offers to vote.
(d) (1) A challenger or watcher may not attempt to:
(i) ascertain how a voter voted or intends to vote;
(ii) converse in the polling place OR EARLY VOTING CENTER with
any voter;
(iii) assist any voter in voting; or
(iv) physically handle an original election document OR VOTING
EQUIPMENT.
(2) An election judge OR A LOCAL BOARD EMPLOYEE ELECTION
DIRECTOR may eject a challenger or watcher who violates the prohibitions under
paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, an
election judge shall [permit] ALLOW an individual other than an accredited challenger or
watcher who desires to challenge the right to vote of any other individual to enter the
polling place OR EARLY VOTING CENTER for that purpose.
(2) A majority of the election judges OR A LOCAL BOARD EMPLOYEE
ELECTION DIRECTOR may limit the number of nonaccredited challengers and watchers
allowed in the polling place OR EARLY VOTING CENTER at any one time for the purpose
of challenging the right of an individual to vote.
(3) A nonaccredited challenger or watcher shall leave the polling place OR
EARLY VOTING CENTER as soon as a majority of the election judges OR A LOCAL BOARD
EMPLOYEE ELECTION DIRECTOR decides the right to vote of the individual challenged
by the challenger or watcher.

HOUSE BILL 1001
(4) In addition to restrictions provided under this subsection, all
restrictions on the actions of an accredited challenger or watcher provided under this
subtitle apply to a nonaccredited challenger or watcher.
11–301.
(a–1) (1) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, a board of canvassers and
the staff of a local board may be observed as they complete each part of the canvass by
authorized observers designated under paragraph (2) of this subsection and any other
individuals who wish to be present.
(2) The following [individuals or entities] PERSONS have the right to
designate a registered voter as an observer at each counting center:
(i) a candidate FOR ANY COUNTY WHERE THE CANDIDATE IS
INCLUDED ON THE BALLOT;
(ii) a political party; [and]
(iii) [any other group of voters supporting or opposing a candidate,
principle, or proposition on the ballot] A POLITICAL COMMITTEE; AND
(IV) A PERSON REQUIRED TO FILE REPORTS UNDER § 13–306 OR
§ 13–307 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.